District of Columbia statutes.
29-912

Meetings; regular and special — Units of membership.

The articles or bylaws may provide for the holding of meetings by units of the membership and may provide for a method of transmitting the votes there cast to the central meeting, or for a method of representation by the election of delegates to the central meeting, or for a combination of both of these methods. If authorized by the articles or the bylaws, members may participate in such meetings remotely in accordance with § 29-305.09.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(i)(6), 59 DCR 13171
2001 Ed., § 29-912.
1981 Ed., § 29-1112.
1973 Ed., § 29-812.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 added the last sentence.
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.